Utah statutes.
71-11-11.   Veterans' Nursing Home Reimbursement Restricted Account.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Veterans' Nursing Home Reimbursement Account."

(2)  The account shall be funded by reimbursement funds from the federal government for veterans' nursing home construction in this state.

(3)  Interest earned or other amounts derived from funds in the account shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(4)  Funds in the account shall be appropriated by the Legislature solely for the purpose of matching future funding for the construction of veterans' nursing homes within Utah and Washington counties.

